test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-basic_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - vajzë: # f
    vajzë+N+Fem+Sg+Indef: vajzë
    vajzë+N+Fem+Sg+Def: vajz
    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Indef: vajza
    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Def: vajzat

    vajzë+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: vajzë
    vajzë+N+Fem+Sg+Abl+Indef: vajze
    vajzë+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: vajze
    vajzë+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: vajze

    vajzë+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: vajza
    vajzë+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: vajzën
    vajzë+N+Fem+Sg+Abl+Def: vajzës
    vajzë+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: vajzës
    vajzë+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: vajzës

    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: vajza
    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: vajza
    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Abl+Indef: vajzash
    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: vajzave
    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: vajzave

    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: vajzat
    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: vajzat
    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Abl+Def: vajzave
    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: vajzave
    vajzë+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: vajzave

  Noun - mal: # mi
    mal+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: mal
    mal+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: mal
    mal+N+Msc+Sg+Abl+Indef: malit
    mal+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: malit
    mal+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: malit
    mal+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: mali
    mal+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: mali
    mal+N+Msc+Sg+Abl+Def: malit
    mal+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: malit
    mal+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: malit

    mal+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: male
    mal+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: male
    mal+N+Msc+Pl+Abl+Indef: maleve
    mal+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: malevet
    mal+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: maleve
    mal+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: malet
    mal+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: malet
    mal+N+Msc+Pl+Abl+Def: maleve
    mal+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: malevet
    mal+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: maleve
